Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 3 of the General Laws, as so appearing in 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after section 9D the following section:- “No member of the general 
court shall be eligible for any additional compensation that a member may receive pursuant to 
section 9B, nor an allowance for expenses pursuant to section 9C, while simultaneously holding 
any other lucrative elective office, excepting that of town meeting member, in any city, town, or 
district within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. An elective office shall be considered 
lucrative when there is attached compensation for services rendered.”